Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 12

Miscellaneous

61-2-1201. Construction.

This chapter shall be so applied and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this chapter.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1202. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Uniform Limited Partnership Act of 1988.”

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 2017, ch. 440, § 3.

61-2-1203. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1204. Effective date and extended effective date.

All limited partnerships formed on or after January 1, 1989, the “effective date” shall be governed by this chapter.

Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f), all limited partnerships formed on or after January 1, 1988, and prior to January 1, 1989, under chapter 2 of this title as hereby repealed, shall continue to be governed by that chapter until July 1, 1989, the “extended effective date,” at which time such limited partnerships shall be governed by this chapter.

Except as provided in subsection (e), a limited partnership formed prior to January 1, 1988, shall continue to be governed by chapter 2 of this title in effect prior to the adoption of chapter 2 of this title as hereby repealed, except that such limited partnership shall not have its term extended except under this chapter.

Except as provided in subsection (e), part 9 of this chapter, relative to foreign limited partnerships, is not effective until July 1, 1989.

Any limited partnership formed prior to January 1, 1989 and any foreign limited partnership may elect to be governed by this chapter before July 1, 1989 by filing with the register of deeds prior to January 1, 1989 and with the secretary of state on and after January 1, 1989 a certificate of limited partnership, or an application for registration as a foreign limited partnership which complies with this chapter or a certificate of amendment which would cause its certificate of limited partnership to comply with this chapter and which specifically states that it is electing to be so bound and by paying the fee for a certificate of limited partnership specified in § 61-2-1207(a)(8). Such certificate may be filed by any general partner without the necessity of obtaining the approval of any limited partner.

With respect to a limited partnership formed on or after January 1, 1988 and prior to January 1, 1989:

On and after July 1, 1989, such limited partnership need not file with the secretary of state a certificate of amendment which would cause its certificate of limited partnership to comply with this chapter until the occurrence of an event which, under this chapter, requires the filing of a certificate of amendment;

Sections 61-2-501 and 61-2-502, and 61-2-607(b) shall apply only to contributions and distributions made after January 1, 1989; and

Section 61-2-704 shall apply only to assignments made after January 1, 1989.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 81-83, 86.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Revised Uniform Limited Partnership Act (Glenn Stophel and James C. Heartfield), 26 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 22 (1990).

61-2-1205. Rules of law and equity.

In any case not provided for in this chapter, the Tennessee Uniform Partnership Law, compiled in chapter 1 of this title, and the rules of law and equity shall govern.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1206. Prior law.

Except as set forth in § 61-2-1204, former chapter 2 of this title is hereby repealed.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1207. Fees.

The secretary of state shall collect the following fees when the documents described in this subsection (a) are delivered to the secretary of state for filing:

Document Fee

Application for use of indistinguishable name $20.00

Application for reservation of limited partnership name 20.00

Notice of transfer of reserved name 20.00

Notice of cancellation of reserved name 20.00

Statement of change of registered agent/office (by domestic/foreign limited partnership) 20.00

Statement of change of registered office of limited partnership (by agent) 5.00 per limited partner- ship, but not less than 20.00

Statement of resignation of registered agent for limited partnership 20.00

Certificate of limited partnership (including designation of initial registered office and agent) 100.00

Amendment to the certificate of limited partnership 20.00

Certificate of cancellation of limited partnership 20.00

Restated certificate of limited partnership 20.00

Amended and restated certificate of limited partnership 20.00

Certificate of merger of limited partnership 100.00

Application for registration of foreign limited partnership (including designation of initial registered office and agent) 600.00

Application for amended registration of foreign limited partnership 20.00

Certificate of cancellation of registration of foreign limited partnership 20.00

Certificate of correction 20.00

Execution, amendment or cancellation of limited partnership by judicial order No Fee

Application for certificate of existence or registration of limited partnership 20.00

Any other document required or permitted to be filed by chapter 2 of this title 20.00

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) each time process is served on the secretary of state under chapter 2 of this title. The party to a proceeding causing service of process is entitled to recover this fee as costs if such party prevails in the proceeding.

The secretary of state shall collect a fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) for copying all filed documents relating to a domestic or foreign limited partnership. All such copies will be certified or validated by the secretary of state.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1; 1989, ch. 270, §§ 84, 87; 1998, ch. 890, § 4; 2000, ch. 568, § 5; 2010, ch. 742, § 13.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 6-801.

61-2-1208. Reserved power of state of Tennessee to alter or repeal chapter.

All provisions of this chapter may be altered from time to time or repealed, and all rights of partners are subject to this reservation.

Acts 1988, ch. 922, § 1.

61-2-1209. Certificate of existence.

Any person may apply to the secretary of state to furnish a certificate of existence for a domestic limited partnership or a certificate of registration for a foreign limited partnership registered to transact business in this state.

A certificate of existence or registration sets forth:

The domestic limited partnership's name or the foreign limited partnership's name used in this state;

That:

The domestic limited partnership is a limited partnership formed under the laws of this state, and the effective date of the filing of its initial certificate of limited partnership; or

The foreign limited partnership is a limited partnership registered to transact business in this state;

That all fees, taxes and penalties owed to this state have been paid, if:

Payment is reflected in the records of the secretary of state or the department of revenue; and

Nonpayment affects the existence or registration of the domestic or foreign limited partnership;

That:

Neither a certificate of cancellation nor a decree of judicial dissolution has been filed for a domestic limited partnership; or

A certificate of cancellation has not been filed for a foreign limited partnership;

That the certificate of existence or registration is effective as of the date of the issuance of the certificate; and

Other facts of record in the office of the secretary of state that may be requested by the applicant.

Subject to any qualifications stated in the certificate, a certificate of existence or registration issued by the secretary of state may be relied upon as conclusive evidence that the domestic or foreign limited partnership has been formed or is registered to transact business in this state, that the domestic limited partnership's certificate of limited partnership has not been cancelled, and that the domestic or foreign limited partnership is in good standing as far as the records of the secretary of state show.

Acts 2010, ch. 742, § 12.